Arkansas, session 2025, SB111.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 17, Chapter 82, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 9 — Dentist and Dental Hygienist Compact

17-82-901. Text of compact.
The Dentist and Dental Hygienist Compact is enacted into law and
entered into by this state with all states legally joining therein and in the
form substantially as follows:

DENTIST AND DENTAL HYGIENIST COMPACT

SECTION 1. TITLE AND PURPOSE
This statute shall be known and cited as the Dentist and Dental
Hygienist Compact. The purposes of this Compact are to facilitate the
interstate practice of dentistry and dental hygiene and improve public access
to dentistry and dental hygiene services by providing Dentists and Dental
Hygienists licensed in a Participating State the ability to practice in
Participating States in which they are not licensed. The Compact does this by
*JMB127*
03-12-2025 11:42:54 JMB127

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 SB111
establishing a pathway for Dentists and Dental Hygienists licensed in a
Participating State to obtain a Compact Privilege that authorizes them to
practice in another Participating State in which they are not licensed. The
Compact enables Participating States to protect the public health and safety
with respect to the practice of such Dentists and Dental Hygienists, through
the State’s authority to regulate the practice of dentistry and dental
hygiene in the State. The Compact:
A. Enables Dentists and Dental Hygienists who qualify for a Compact
Privilege to practice in other Participating States without satisfying
burdensome and duplicative requirements associated with securing a License to
practice in those States;
B. Promotes mobility and addresses workforce shortages through each
Participating State’s acceptance of a Compact Privilege to practice in that
State;
C. Increases public access to qualified, licensed Dentists and Dental
Hygienists by creating a responsible, streamlined pathway for Licensees to
practice in Participating States;
D. Enhances the ability of Participating States to protect the
public’s health and safety;
E. Does not interfere with licensure requirements established by a
Participating State;
F. Facilitates the sharing of licensure and disciplinary information
among Participating States;
G. Requires Dentists and Dental Hygienists who practice in a
Participating State pursuant to a Compact Privilege to practice within the
Scope of Practice authorized in that State;
H. Extends the authority of a Participating State to regulate the
practice of dentistry and dental hygiene within its borders to Dentists and
Dental Hygienists who practice in the State through a Compact Privilege;
I. Promotes the cooperation of Participating States in regulating the
practice of dentistry and dental hygiene within those States;
J. Facilitates the relocation of military members and their spouses
who are licensed to practice dentistry or dental hygiene.

SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS
As used in this Compact, unless the context requires otherwise, the
03-12-2025 11:42:54 JMB127

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 SB111
following definitions shall apply:
A. “Active Military Member” means any person with full-time duty
status in the armed forces of the United States, including members of the
National Guard and Reserve.
B. “Adverse Action” means disciplinary action or encumbrance imposed
on a License or Compact Privilege by a State Licensing Authority.
C. “Alternative Program” means a non-disciplinary monitoring or
practice remediation process applicable to a Dentist or Dental Hygienist
approved by a State Licensing Authority of a Participating State in which the
Dentist or Dental Hygienist is licensed. This includes, but is not limited
to, programs to which Licensees with substance abuse or addiction issues are
referred in lieu of Adverse Action.
D. “Clinical Assessment” means examination or process, required for
licensure as a Dentist or Dental Hygienist as applicable, that provides
evidence of clinical competence in dentistry or dental hygiene.
E. “Commissioner” means the individual appointed by a Participating
State to serve as the member of the Commission for that Participating State.
F. “Compact” means this Dentist and Dental Hygienist Compact.
G. “Compact Privilege” means the authorization granted by a Remote
State to allow a Licensee from a Participating State to practice as a Dentist
or Dental Hygienist in a Remote State.
H. “Continuing Professional Development” means a requirement, as a
condition of License renewal to provide evidence of successful participation
in educational or professional activities relevant to practice or area of
work.
I. “Criminal Background Check” means the submission of fingerprints or
other biometric-based information for a License applicant for the purpose of
obtaining that applicant’s criminal history record information, as defined in
28 C.F.R. § 20.3(d) from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the State’s
criminal history record repository as defined in 28 C.F.R. § 20.3(f).
J. “Data System” means the Commission’s repository of information
about Licensees, including but not limited to examination, licensure,
investigative, Compact Privilege, Adverse Action, and Alternative Program.
K. “Dental Hygienist” means an individual who is licensed by a State
Licensing Authority to practice dental hygiene.
L. “Dentist” means an individual who is licensed by a State Licensing
03-12-2025 11:42:54 JMB127

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 SB111
Authority to practice dentistry.
M. “Dentist and Dental Hygienist Compact Commission” or “Commission”
means a joint government agency established by this Compact comprised of each
State that has enacted the Compact and a national administrative body
comprised of a Commissioner from each State that has enacted the Compact.
N. “Encumbered License” means a License that a State Licensing
Authority has limited in any way other than through an Alternative Program.
O. “Executive Board” means the Chair, Vice Chair, Secretary and
Treasurer and any other Commissioners as may be determined by Commission Rule
or bylaw.
P. “Jurisprudence Requirement” means the assessment of an individual’s
knowledge of the laws and Rules governing the practice of dentistry or dental
hygiene, as applicable, in a State.
Q. “License” means current authorization by a State, other than
authorization pursuant to a Compact Privilege, or other privilege, for an
individual to practice as a Dentist or Dental Hygienist in that State.
R. “Licensee” means an individual who holds an unrestricted License
from a Participating State to practice as a Dentist or Dental Hygienist in
that State.
S. “Model Compact” means the model for the Dentist and Dental
Hygienist Compact on file with the Council of State Governments or other
entity as designated by the Commission.
T. “Participating State” means a State that has enacted the Compact
and been admitted to the Commission in accordance with the provisions herein
and Commission Rules.
U. “Qualifying License” means a License that is not an Encumbered
License issued by a Participating State to practice dentistry or dental
hygiene.
V. “Remote State” means a Participating State where a Licensee who is
not licensed as a Dentist or Dental Hygienist is exercising or seeking to
exercise the Compact Privilege.
W. “Rule” means a regulation promulgated by an entity that has the
force of law.
X. “Scope of Practice” means the procedures, actions, and processes a
Dentist or Dental Hygienist licensed in a State is permitted to undertake in
that State and the circumstances under which the Licensee is permitted to
03-12-2025 11:42:54 JMB127

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 SB111
undertake those procedures, actions and processes. Such procedures, actions
and processes and the circumstances under which they may be undertaken may be
established through means, including, but not limited to, statute,
regulations, case law, and other processes available to the State Licensing
Authority or other government agency.
Y. “Significant Investigative Information” means information, records,
and documents received or generated by a State Licensing Authority pursuant
to an investigation for which a determination has been made that there is
probable cause to believe that the Licensee has violated a statute or
regulation that is considered more than a minor infraction for which the
State Licensing Authority could pursue Adverse Action against the Licensee.
Z. “State” means any state, commonwealth, district, or territory of
the United States of America that regulates the practices of dentistry and
dental hygiene.
AA. “State Licensing Authority” means an agency or other entity of a
State that is responsible for the licensing and regulation of Dentists or
Dental Hygienists.

SECTION 3. STATE PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT
A. In order to join the Compact and thereafter continue as a
Participating State, a State must:
1. Enact a compact that is not materially different from the
Model Compact as determined in accordance with Commission Rules;
2. Participate fully in the Commission’s Data System;
3. Have a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating
complaints about its Licensees and License applicants;
4. Notify the Commission, in compliance with the terms of the
Compact and Commission Rules, of any Adverse Action or the availability of
Significant Investigative Information regarding a Licensee and License
applicant;
5. Fully implement a Criminal Background Check requirement,
within a time frame established by Commission Rule, by receiving the results
of a qualifying Criminal Background Check;
6. Comply with the Commission Rules applicable to a
Participating State;
7. Accept the National Board Examinations of the Joint
03-12-2025 11:42:54 JMB127

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 SB111
Commission on National Dental Examinations or another examination accepted by
Commission Rule as a licensure examination;
8. Accept for licensure those applicants for a Dentist License
who have graduated from a predoctoral dental education program accredited by
the Commission on Dental Accreditation, or another accrediting agency
recognized by the United States Department of Education for the accreditation
of dentistry and dental hygiene education programs, leading to the Doctor of
Dental Surgery (D.D.S.) or Doctor of Dental Medicine (D.M.D.) degree;
9. Accept for licensure those applicants for a Dental Hygienist
License who have graduated from a dental hygiene education program accredited
by the Commission on Dental Accreditation or another accrediting agency
recognized by the United States Department of Education for the accreditation
of dentistry and dental hygiene education programs;
10. Require for licensure that applicants successfully complete
a Clinical Assessment;
11. Have Continuing Professional Development requirements as a
condition for License renewal; and
12. Pay a participation fee to the Commission as established by
Commission Rule.
B. Providing alternative pathways for an individual to obtain an
unrestricted License does not disqualify a State from participating in the
Compact.
C. When conducting a Criminal Background Check the State Licensing
Authority shall:
1. Consider that information in making a licensure decision;
2. Maintain documentation of completion of the Criminal
Background Check and background check information to the extent allowed by
State and federal law; and
3. Report to the Commission whether it has completed the
Criminal Background Check and whether the individual was granted or denied a
License.
D. A Licensee of a Participating State who has a Qualifying License in
that State and does not hold an Encumbered License in any other Participating
State, shall be issued a Compact Privilege in a Remote State in accordance
with the terms of the Compact and Commission Rules. If a Remote State has a
Jurisprudence Requirement a Compact Privilege will not be issued to the
03-12-2025 11:42:54 JMB127

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 SB111
Licensee unless the Licensee has satisfied the Jurisprudence Requirement.

SECTION 4. COMPACT PRIVILEGE
A. To obtain and exercise the Compact Privilege under the terms and
provisions of the Compact, the Licensee shall:
1. Have a Qualifying License as a Dentist or Dental Hygienist in
a Participating State;
2. Be eligible for a Compact Privilege in any Remote State in
accordance with D, G and H of this section;
3. Submit to an application process whenever the Licensee is
seeking a Compact Privilege;
4. Pay any applicable Commission and Remote State fees for a
Compact Privilege in the Remote State;
5. Meet any Jurisprudence Requirement established by a Remote
State in which the Licensee is seeking a Compact Privilege;
6. Have passed a National Board Examination of the Joint
Commission on National Dental Examinations or another examination accepted by
Commission Rule;
7. For a Dentist, have graduated from a predoctoral dental
education program accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation, or
another accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of
Education for the accreditation of dentistry and dental hygiene education
programs, leading to the Doctor of Dental Surgery (D.D.S.) or Doctor of
Dental Medicine (D.M.D.) degree;
8. For a Dental Hygienist, have graduated from a dental hygiene
education program accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation or
another accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of
Education for the accreditation of dentistry and dental hygiene education
programs;
9. Have successfully completed a Clinical Assessment for
licensure;
10. Report to the Commission Adverse Action taken by any non-
Participating State when applying for a Compact Privilege and, otherwise,
within thirty (30) days from the date the Adverse Action is taken;
11. Report to the Commission when applying for a Compact
Privilege the address of the Licensee’s primary residence and thereafter
03-12-2025 11:42:54 JMB127

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 SB111
immediately report to the Commission any change in the address of the
Licensee’s primary residence; and
12. Consent to accept service of process by mail at the
Licensee’s primary residence on record with the Commission with respect to
any action brought against the Licensee by the Commission or a Participating
State, and consent to accept service of a subpoena by mail at the Licensee’s
primary residence on record with the Commission with respect to any action
brought or investigation conducted by the Commission or a Participating
State.
B. The Licensee must comply with the requirements of subsection A of
this section to maintain the Compact Privilege in the Remote State. If those
requirements are met, the Compact Privilege will continue as long as the
Licensee maintains a Qualifying License in the State through which the
Licensee applied for the Compact Privilege and pays any applicable Compact
Privilege renewal fees.
C. A Licensee providing dentistry or dental hygiene in a Remote State
under the Compact Privilege shall function within the Scope of Practice
authorized by the Remote State for a Dentist or Dental Hygienist licensed in
that State.
D. A Licensee providing dentistry or dental hygiene pursuant to a
Compact Privilege in a Remote State is subject to that State’s regulatory
authority. A Remote State may, in accordance with due process and that
State’s laws, by Adverse Action revoke or remove a Licensee’s Compact
Privilege in the Remote State for a specific period of time and impose fines
or take any other necessary actions to protect the health and safety of its
citizens. If a Remote State imposes an Adverse Action against a Compact
Privilege that limits the Compact Privilege, that Adverse Action applies to
all Compact Privileges in all Remote States. A Licensee whose Compact
Privilege in a Remote State is removed for a specified period of time is not
eligible for a Compact Privilege in any other Remote State until the specific
time for removal of the Compact Privilege has passed and all encumbrance
requirements are satisfied.
E. If a License in a Participating State is an Encumbered License, the
Licensee shall lose the Compact Privilege in a Remote State and shall not be
eligible for a Compact Privilege in any Remote State until the License is no
longer encumbered.
03-12-2025 11:42:54 JMB127

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 SB111
F. Once an Encumbered License in a Participating State is restored to
good standing, the Licensee must meet the requirements of subsection A of
this section to obtain a Compact Privilege in a Remote State.
G. If a Licensee’s Compact Privilege in a Remote State is removed by
the Remote State, the individual shall lose or be ineligible for the Compact
Privilege in any Remote State until the following occur:
1. The specific period of time for which the Compact Privilege
was removed has ended; and
2. All conditions for removal of the Compact Privilege have been
satisfied.
H. Once the requirements of subsection G of this section have been
met, the Licensee must meet the requirements in subsection A of this section
to obtain a Compact Privilege in a Remote State.

SECTION 5. ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBER OR THEIR SPOUSES
An Active Military Member and their spouse shall not be required to pay
to the Commission for a Compact Privilege the fee otherwise charged by the
Commission. If a Remote State chooses to charge a fee for a Compact
Privilege, it may choose to charge a reduced fee or no fee to an Active
Military Member and their spouse for a Compact Privilege.

SECTION 6. ADVERSE ACTIONS
A. A Participating State in which a Licensee is licensed shall have
exclusive authority to impose Adverse Action against the Qualifying License
issued by that Participating State.
B. A Participating State may take Adverse Action based on the
Significant Investigative Information of a Remote State, so long as the
Participating State follows its own procedures for imposing Adverse Action.
C. Nothing in this Compact shall override a Participating State’s
decision that participation in an Alternative Program may be used in lieu of
Adverse Action and that such participation shall remain non-public if
required by the Participating State’s laws. Participating States must require
Licensees who enter any Alternative Program in lieu of discipline to agree
not to practice pursuant to a Compact Privilege in any other Participating
State during the term of the Alternative Program without prior authorization
from such other Participating State.
03-12-2025 11:42:54 JMB127

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 SB111
D. Any Participating State in which a Licensee is applying to practice
or is practicing pursuant to a Compact Privilege may investigate actual or
alleged violations of the statutes and regulations authorizing the practice
of dentistry or dental hygiene in any other Participating State in which the
Dentist or Dental Hygienist holds a License or Compact Privilege.
E. A Remote State shall have the authority to:
1. Take Adverse Actions as set forth in Section 4.D against a
Licensee’s Compact Privilege in the State;
2. In furtherance of its rights and responsibilities under the
Compact and the Commission’s Rules issue subpoenas for both hearings and
investigations that require the attendance and testimony of witnesses, and
the production of evidence. Subpoenas issued by a State Licensing Authority
in a Participating State for the attendance and testimony of witnesses, or
the production of evidence from another Participating State, shall be
enforced in the latter State by any court of competent jurisdiction,
according to the practice and procedure of that court applicable to subpoenas
issued in proceedings pending before it. The issuing authority shall pay any
witness fees, travel expenses, mileage, and other fees required by the
service statutes of the State where the witnesses or evidence are located;
and
3. If otherwise permitted by State law, recover from the
Licensee the costs of investigations and disposition of cases resulting from
any Adverse Action taken against that Licensee.
F. Joint Investigations
1. In addition to the authority granted to a Participating State
by its Dentist or Dental Hygienist licensure act or other applicable State
law, a Participating State may jointly investigate Licensees with other
Participating States.
2. Participating States shall share any Significant
Investigative Information, litigation, or compliance materials in furtherance
of any joint or individual investigation initiated under the Compact.
G. Authority to Continue Investigation
1. After a Licensee's Compact Privilege in a Remote State is
terminated, the Remote State may continue an investigation of the Licensee
that began when the Licensee had a Compact Privilege in that Remote State.
2. If the investigation yields what would be Significant
03-12-2025 11:42:54 JMB127

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 SB111
Investigative Information had the Licensee continued to have a Compact
Privilege in that Remote State, the Remote State shall report the presence of
such information to the Data System as required by Section 8.B.6 as if it was
Significant Investigative Information.

SECTION 7. ESTABLISHMENT AND OPERATION OF THE COMMISSION.
A. The Compact Participating States hereby create and establish a
joint government agency whose membership consists of all Participating States
that have enacted the Compact. The Commission is an instrumentality of the
Participating States acting jointly and not an instrumentality of any one
State. The Commission shall come into existence on or after the effective
date of the Compact as set forth in Section 11A.
B. Participation, Voting, and Meetings
1. Each Participating State shall have and be limited to one (1)
Commissioner selected by that Participating State’s State Licensing Authority
or, if the State has more than one State Licensing Authority, selected
collectively by the State Licensing Authorities.
2. The Commissioner shall be a member or designee of such
Authority or Authorities.
3. The Commission may by Rule or bylaw establish a term of
office for Commissioners and may by Rule or bylaw establish term limits.
4. The Commission may recommend to a State Licensing Authority
or Authorities, as applicable, removal or suspension of an individual as the
State’s Commissioner.
5. A Participating State’s State Licensing Authority, or
Authorities, as applicable, shall fill any vacancy of its Commissioner on the
Commission within sixty (60) days of the vacancy.
6. Each Commissioner shall be entitled to one vote on all
matters that are voted upon by the Commission.
7. The Commission shall meet at least once during each calendar
year. Additional meetings may be held as set forth in the bylaws. The
Commission may meet by telecommunication, video conference or other similar
electronic means.
C. The Commission shall have the following powers:
1. Establish the fiscal year of the Commission;
2. Establish a code of conduct and conflict of interest
03-12-2025 11:42:54 JMB127

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 SB111
policies;
3. Adopt Rules and bylaws;
4. Maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws;
5. Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the
provisions of this Compact, the Commission’s Rules, and the bylaws;
6. Initiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions in the
name of the Commission, provided that the standing of any State Licensing
Authority to sue or be sued under applicable law shall not be affected;
7. Maintain and certify records and information provided to a
Participating State as the authenticated business records of the Commission,
and designate a person to do so on the Commission's behalf;
8. Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
9. Borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel,
including, but not limited to, employees of a Participating State;
10. Conduct an annual financial review;
11. Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation,
define duties, grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry out the
purposes of the Compact, and establish the Commission’s personnel policies
and programs relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel,
and other related personnel matters;
12. As set forth in the Commission Rules, charge a fee to a
Licensee for the grant of a Compact Privilege in a Remote State and
thereafter, as may be established by Commission Rule, charge the Licensee a
Compact Privilege renewal fee for each renewal period in which that Licensee
exercises or intends to exercise the Compact Privilege in that Remote State.
Nothing herein shall be construed to prevent a Remote State from charging a
Licensee a fee for a Compact Privilege or renewals of a Compact Privilege, or
a fee for the Jurisprudence Requirement if the Remote State imposes such a
requirement for the grant of a Compact Privilege;
13. Accept any and all appropriate gifts, donations, grants of
money, other sources of revenue, equipment, supplies, materials, and
services, and receive, utilize, and dispose of the same; provided that at all
times the Commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety and/or
conflict of interest;
14. Lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, or use any
property, real, personal, or mixed, or any undivided interest therein;
03-12-2025 11:42:54 JMB127

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 SB111
15. Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or
otherwise dispose of any property real, personal, or mixed;
16. Establish a budget and make expenditures;
17. Borrow money;
18. Appoint committees, including standing committees, which may
be composed of members, State regulators, State legislators or their
representatives, and consumer representatives, and such other interested
persons as may be designated in this Compact and the bylaws;
19. Provide and receive information from, and cooperate with,
law enforcement agencies;
20. Elect a Chair, Vice Chair, Secretary and Treasurer and such
other officers of the Commission as provided in the Commission’s bylaws;
21. Establish and elect an Executive Board;
22. Adopt and provide to the Participating States an annual
report;
23. Determine whether a State’s enacted compact is materially
different from the Model Compact language such that the State would not
qualify for participation in the Compact; and
24. Perform such other functions as may be necessary or
appropriate to achieve the purposes of this Compact.
D. Meetings of the Commission
1. All meetings of the Commission that are not closed pursuant
to this subsection shall be open to the public. Notice of public meetings
shall be posted on the Commission’s website at least thirty (30) days prior
to the public meeting.
2. Notwithstanding subsection D.1 of this section, the
Commission may convene an emergency public meeting by providing at least
twenty-four (24) hours prior notice on the Commission’s website, and any
other means as provided in the Commission’s Rules, for any of the reasons it
may dispense with notice of proposed rulemaking under Section 9.L. The
Commission’s legal counsel shall certify that one of the reasons justifying
an emergency public meeting has been met.
3. Notice of all Commission meetings shall provide the time,
date, and location of the meeting, and if the meeting is to be held or
accessible via telecommunication, video conference, or other electronic
means, the notice shall include the mechanism for access to the meeting
03-12-2025 11:42:54 JMB127

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 SB111
through such means.
4. The Commission may convene in a closed, non-public meeting
for the Commission to receive legal advice or to discuss:
a. Non-compliance of a Participating State with its
obligations under the Compact;
b. The employment, compensation, discipline or other
matters, practices or procedures related to specific employees or other
matters related to the Commission’s internal personnel practices and
procedures;
c. Current or threatened discipline of a Licensee or
Compact Privilege holder by the Commission or by a Participating State’s
State Licensing Authority;
d. Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated
litigation;
e. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or
sale of goods, services, or real estate;
f. Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring
any person;
g. Trade secrets or commercial or financial information
that is privileged or confidential;
h. Information of a personal nature where disclosure would
constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;
i. Investigative records compiled for law enforcement
purposes;
j. Information related to any investigative reports
prepared by or on behalf of or for use of the Commission or other committee
charged with responsibility of investigation or determination of compliance
issues pursuant to the Compact;
k. Legal advice;
l. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure to the
public by federal or Participating State law; and
m. Other matters as promulgated by the Commission by Rule.
5. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed, the
presiding officer shall state that the meeting will be closed and reference
each relevant exempting provision, and such reference shall be recorded in
the minutes.
03-12-2025 11:42:54 JMB127

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 SB111
6. The Commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly
describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and
accurate summary of actions taken, and the reasons therefore, including a
description of the views expressed. All documents considered in connection
with an action shall be identified in such minutes. All minutes and documents
of a closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release only by a
majority vote of the Commission or order of a court of competent
jurisdiction.
E. Financing of the Commission
1. The Commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the
reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing
activities.
2. The Commission may accept any and all appropriate sources of
revenue, donations, and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials, and
services.
3. The Commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment
from each Participating State and impose fees on Licensees of Participating
States when a Compact Privilege is granted, to cover the cost of the
operations and activities of the Commission and its staff, which must be in a
total amount sufficient to cover its annual budget as approved each fiscal
year for which sufficient revenue is not provided by other sources. The
aggregate annual assessment amount for Participating States shall be
allocated based upon a formula that the Commission shall promulgate by Rule.
4. The Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior
to securing the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall the Commission
pledge the credit of any Participating State, except by and with the
authority of the Participating State.
5. The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts
and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the Commission shall be
subject to the financial review and accounting procedures established under
its bylaws. All receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the Commission
shall be subject to an annual financial review by a certified or licensed
public accountant, and the report of the financial review shall be included
in and become part of the annual report of the Commission.
F. The Executive Board
1. The Executive Board shall have the power to act on behalf of
03-12-2025 11:42:54 JMB127

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 SB111
the Commission according to the terms of this Compact. The powers, duties,
and responsibilities of the Executive Board shall include:
a. Overseeing the day-to-day activities of the
administration of the Compact including compliance with the provisions of the
Compact, the Commission’s Rules and bylaws;
b. Recommending to the Commission changes to the Rules or
bylaws, changes to this Compact legislation, fees charged to Compact
Participating States, fees charged to Licensees, and other fees;
c. Ensuring Compact administration services are
appropriately provided, including by contract;
d. Preparing and recommending the budget;
e. Maintaining financial records on behalf of the
Commission;
f. Monitoring Compact compliance of Participating States
and providing compliance reports to the Commission;
g. Establishing additional committees as necessary;
h. Exercising the powers and duties of the Commission
during the interim between Commission meetings, except for adopting or
amending Rules, adopting or amending bylaws, and exercising any other powers
and duties expressly reserved to the Commission by Rule or bylaw; and
i. Other duties as provided in the Rules or bylaws of the
Commission.
2. The Executive Board shall be composed of up to seven (7)
members:
a. The Chair, Vice Chair, Secretary and Treasurer of the
Commission and any other members of the Commission who serve on the Executive
Board shall be voting members of the Executive Board; and
b. Other than the Chair, Vice Chair, Secretary, and
Treasurer, the Commission may elect up to three (3) voting members from the
current membership of the Commission.
3. The Commission may remove any member of the Executive Board
as provided in the Commission’s bylaws.
4. The Executive Board shall meet at least annually.
a. An Executive Board meeting at which it takes or intends
to take formal action on a matter shall be open to the public, except that
the Executive Board may meet in a closed, non-public session of a public
03-12-2025 11:42:54 JMB127

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 SB111
meeting when dealing with any of the matters covered under subsection D.4.
b. The Executive Board shall give five (5) business days’
notice of its public meetings, posted on its website and as it may otherwise
determine to provide notice to persons with an interest in the public matters
the Executive Board intends to address at those meetings.
5. The Executive Board may hold an emergency meeting when acting
for the Commission to:
a. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or
welfare;
b. Prevent a loss of Commission or Participating State
funds; or
c. Protect public health and safety.
G. Qualified Immunity, Defense, and Indemnification
1. The members, officers, executive director, employees and
representatives of the Commission shall be immune from suit and liability,
both personally and in their official capacity, for any claim for damage to
or loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability caused by or
arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred,
or that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for
believing occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties or
responsibilities; provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be construed
to protect any such person from suit or liability for any damage, loss,
injury, or liability caused by the intentional or willful or wanton
misconduct of that person. The procurement of insurance of any type by the
Commission shall not in any way compromise or limit the immunity granted
hereunder.
2. The Commission shall defend any member, officer, executive
director, employee, and representative of the Commission in any civil action
seeking to impose liability arising out of any actual or alleged act, error,
or omission that occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties,
or responsibilities, or as determined by the Commission that the person
against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred
within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities;
provided that nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit that person from
retaining their own counsel at their own expense; and provided further, that
the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from that
03-12-2025 11:42:54 JMB127

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 SB111
person’s intentional or willful or wanton misconduct.
3. Notwithstanding subsection G.1 of this section, should any
member, officer, executive director, employee, or representative of the
Commission be held liable for the amount of any settlement or judgment
arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred
within the scope of that individual's employment, duties, or responsibilities
for the Commission, or that the person to whom that individual is liable had
a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of the
individual's employment, duties, or responsibilities for the Commission, the
Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless such individual, provided that
the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from the
intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of the individual.
4. Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the
liability of any Licensee for professional malpractice or misconduct, which
shall be governed solely by any other applicable State laws.
5. Nothing in this Compact shall be interpreted to waive or
otherwise abrogate a Participating State’s state action immunity or state
action affirmative defense with respect to antitrust claims under the Sherman
Act, Clayton Act, or any other State or federal antitrust or anticompetitive
law or regulation.
6. Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a waiver of
sovereign immunity by the Participating States or by the Commission.

SECTION 8. DATA SYSTEM
A. The Commission shall provide for the development, maintenance,
operation, and utilization of a coordinated database and reporting system
containing licensure, Adverse Action, and the presence of Significant
Investigative Information on all Licensees and applicants for a License in
Participating States.
B. Notwithstanding any other provision of State law to the contrary, a
Participating State shall submit a uniform data set to the Data System on all
individuals to whom this Compact is applicable as required by the Rules of
the Commission, including:
1. Identifying information;
2. Licensure data;
3. Adverse Actions against a Licensee, License applicant or
03-12-2025 11:42:54 JMB127

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 SB111
Compact Privilege and information related thereto;
4. Non-confidential information related to Alternative Program
participation, the beginning and ending dates of such participation, and
other information related to such participation;
5. Any denial of an application for licensure, and the reason(s)
for such denial, (excluding the reporting of any criminal history record
information where prohibited by law);
6. The presence of Significant Investigative Information; and
7. Other information that may facilitate the administration of
this Compact or the protection of the public, as determined by the Rules of
the Commission.
C. The records and information provided to a Participating State
pursuant to this Compact or through the Data System, when certified by the
Commission or an agent thereof, shall constitute the authenticated business
records of the Commission, and shall be entitled to any associated hearsay
exception in any relevant judicial, quasi-judicial or administrative
proceedings in a Participating State.
D. Significant Investigative Information pertaining to a Licensee in
any Participating State will only be available to other Participating States.
E. It is the responsibility of the Participating States to monitor the
database to determine whether Adverse Action has been taken against a
Licensee or License applicant. Adverse Action information pertaining to a
Licensee or License applicant in any Participating State will be available to
any other Participating State.
F. Participating States contributing information to the Data System
may designate information that may not be shared with the public without the
express permission of the contributing State.
G. Any information submitted to the Data System that is subsequently
expunged pursuant to federal law or the laws of the Participating State
contributing the information shall be removed from the Data System.

SECTION 9. RULEMAKING
A. The Commission shall promulgate reasonable Rules in order to
effectively and efficiently implement and administer the purposes and
provisions of the Compact. A Commission Rule shall be invalid and have no
force or effect only if a court of competent jurisdiction holds that the Rule
03-12-2025 11:42:54 JMB127

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 SB111
is invalid because the Commission exercised its rulemaking authority in a
manner that is beyond the scope and purposes of the Compact, or the powers
granted hereunder, or based upon another applicable standard of review.
B. The Rules of the Commission shall have the force of law in each
Participating State, provided however that where the Rules of the Commission
conflict with the laws of the Participating State that establish the
Participating State’s Scope of Practice as held by a court of competent
jurisdiction, the Rules of the Commission shall be ineffective in that State
to the extent of the conflict.
C. The Commission shall exercise its Rulemaking powers pursuant to the
criteria set forth in this section and the Rules adopted thereunder. Rules
shall become binding as of the date specified by the Commission for each
Rule.
D. If a majority of the legislatures of the Participating States
rejects a Commission Rule or portion of a Commission Rule, by enactment of a
statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt the Compact, within
four (4) years of the date of adoption of the Rule, then such Rule shall have
no further force and effect in any Participating State or to any State
applying to participate in the Compact.
E. Rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the
Commission.
F. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule, the Commission shall hold a
public hearing and allow persons to provide oral and written comments, data,
facts, opinions, and arguments.
G . Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule by the Commission, and at
least thirty (30) days in advance of the meeting at which the Commission will
hold a public hearing on the proposed Rule, the Commission shall provide a
Notice of Proposed Rulemaking:
1. On the website of the Commission or other publicly accessible
platform;
2. To persons who have requested notice of the Commission’s
notices of proposed rulemaking, and
3. In such other way(s) as the Commission may by Rule specify.
H. The Notice of Proposed Rulemaking shall include:
1. The time, date, and location of the public hearing at which
the Commission will hear public comments on the proposed Rule and, if
03-12-2025 11:42:54 JMB127

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 SB111
different, the time, date, and location of the meeting where the Commission
will consider and vote on the proposed Rule;
2. If the hearing is held via telecommunication, video
conference, or other electronic means, the Commission shall include the
mechanism for access to the hearing in the Notice of Proposed Rulemaking;
3. The text of the proposed Rule and the reason therefor;
4. A request for comments on the proposed Rule from any
interested person; and
5. The manner in which interested persons may submit written
comments.
I. All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the recording and all
written comments and documents received by the Commission in response to the
proposed Rule shall be available to the public.
J. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a separate
hearing on each Commission Rule. Rules may be grouped for the convenience of
the Commission at hearings required by this section.
K. The Commission shall, by majority vote of all Commissioners, take
final action on the proposed Rule based on the rulemaking record.
1. The Commission may adopt changes to the proposed Rule
provided the changes do not enlarge the original purpose of the proposed
Rule.
2. The Commission shall provide an explanation of the reasons
for substantive changes made to the proposed Rule as well as reasons for
substantive changes not made that were recommended by commenters.
3. The Commission shall determine a reasonable effective date
for the Rule. Except for an emergency as provided in subsection L, the
effective date of the Rule shall be no sooner than thirty (30) days after the
Commission issuing the notice that it adopted or amended the Rule.
L. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the Commission may
consider and adopt an emergency Rule with 24 hours’ notice, with opportunity
to comment, provided that the usual rulemaking procedures provided in the
Compact and in this section shall be retroactively applied to the Rule as
soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety (90) days after
the effective date of the Rule. For the purposes of this provision, an
emergency Rule is one that must be adopted immediately in order to:
1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;
03-12-2025 11:42:54 JMB127

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 SB111
2. Prevent a loss of Commission or Participating State funds;
3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of a Rule that is
established by federal law or rule; or
4. Protect public health and safety.
M. The Commission or an authorized committee of the Commission may
direct revisions to a previously adopted Rule for purposes of correcting
typographical errors, errors in format, errors in consistency, or grammatical
errors. Public notice of any revisions shall be posted on the website of the
Commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by any person for a
period of thirty (30) days after posting. The revision may be challenged only
on grounds that the revision results in a material change to a Rule. A
challenge shall be made in writing and delivered to the Commission prior to
the end of the notice period. If no challenge is made, the revision will take
effect without further action. If the revision is challenged, the revision
may not take effect without the approval of the Commission.
N. No Participating State’s rulemaking requirements shall apply under
this Compact

SECTION 10. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND ENFORCEMENT
A. Oversight
1. The executive and judicial branches of State government in
each Participating State shall enforce this Compact and take all actions
necessary and appropriate to implement the Compact.
2. Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the
Commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a court of competent
jurisdiction where the principal office of the Commission is located. The
Commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to the extent it
adopts or consents to participate in alternative dispute resolution
proceedings. Nothing herein shall affect or limit the selection or propriety
of venue in any action against a Licensee for professional malpractice,
misconduct or any such similar matter.
3. The Commission shall be entitled to receive service of
process in any proceeding regarding the enforcement or interpretation of the
Compact or Commission Rule and shall have standing to intervene in such a
proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide the Commission service of
process shall render a judgment or order void as to the Commission, this
03-12-2025 11:42:54 JMB127

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 SB111
Compact, or promulgated Rules.
B. Default, Technical Assistance, and Termination
1. If the Commission determines that a Participating State has
defaulted in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under
this Compact or the promulgated Rules, the Commission shall provide written
notice to the defaulting State. The notice of default shall describe the
default, the proposed means of curing the default, and any other action that
the Commission may take, and shall offer training and specific technical
assistance regarding the default.
2. The Commission shall provide a copy of the notice of default
to the other Participating States.
C. If a State in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting
State may be terminated from the Compact upon an affirmative vote of a
majority of the Commissioners, and all rights, privileges and benefits
conferred on that State by this Compact may be terminated on the effective
date of termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the offending
State of obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of default.
D. Termination of participation in the Compact shall be imposed only
after all other means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of
intent to suspend or terminate shall be given by the Commission to the
governor, the majority and minority leaders of the defaulting State’s
legislature, the defaulting State’s State Licensing Authority or Authorities,
as applicable, and each of the Participating States’ State Licensing
Authority or Authorities, as applicable.
E. A State that has been terminated is responsible for all
assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred through the effective date
of termination, including obligations that extend beyond the effective date
of termination.
F. Upon the termination of a State’s participation in this Compact,
that State shall immediately provide notice to all Licensees of the State,
including Licensees of other Participating States issued a Compact Privilege
to practice within that State, of such termination. The terminated State
shall continue to recognize all Compact Privileges then in effect in that
State for a minimum of one hundred eighty (180) days after the date of said
notice of termination.
G. The Commission shall not bear any costs related to a State that is
03-12-2025 11:42:54 JMB127

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 SB111
found to be in default or that has been terminated from the Compact, unless
agreed upon in writing between the Commission and the defaulting State.
H. The defaulting State may appeal the action of the Commission by
petitioning the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia or the
federal district where the Commission has its principal offices. The
prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including
reasonable attorney’s fees.
I. Dispute Resolution
1. Upon request by a Participating State, the Commission shall
attempt to resolve disputes related to the Compact that arise among
Participating States and between Participating States and non-Participating
States.
2. The Commission shall promulgate a Rule providing for both
mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.
J. Enforcement
1. The Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion,
shall enforce the provisions of this Compact and the Commission’s Rules.
2. By majority vote, the Commission may initiate legal action
against a Participating State in default in the United States District Court
for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the Commission has
its principal offices to enforce compliance with the provisions of the
Compact and its promulgated Rules. The relief sought may include both
injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is
necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such
litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees. The remedies herein shall
not be the exclusive remedies of the Commission. The Commission may pursue
any other remedies available under federal or the defaulting Participating
State’s law.
3. A Participating State may initiate legal action against the
Commission in the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia or the
federal district where the Commission has its principal offices to enforce
compliance with the provisions of the Compact and its promulgated Rules. The
relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event
judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all
costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.
4. No individual or entity other than a Participating State may
03-12-2025 11:42:54 JMB127

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 SB111
enforce this Compact against the Commission.

SECTION 11. EFFECTIVE DATE, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT
A. The Compact shall come into effect on the date on which the Compact
statute is enacted into law in the seventh Participating State.
1. On or after the effective date of the Compact, the Commission
shall convene and review the enactment of each of the States that enacted the
Compact prior to the Commission convening (“Charter Participating States”) to
determine if the statute enacted by each such Charter Participating State is
materially different than the Model Compact.
a. A Charter Participating State whose enactment is found
to be materially different from the Model Compact shall be entitled to the
default process set forth in Section 10.
b. If any Participating State is later found to be in
default, or is terminated or withdraws from the Compact, the Commission shall
remain in existence and the Compact shall remain in effect even if the number
of Participating States should be less than seven (7).
2. Participating States enacting the Compact subsequent to the
Charter Participating States shall be subject to the process set forth in
Section 7.C.23 to determine if their enactments are materially different from
the Model Compact and whether they qualify for participation in the Compact.
3. All actions taken for the benefit of the Commission or in
furtherance of the purposes of the administration of the Compact prior to the
effective date of the Compact or the Commission coming into existence shall
be considered to be actions of the Commission unless specifically repudiated
by the Commission.
4. Any State that joins the Compact subsequent to the
Commission’s initial adoption of the Rules and bylaws shall be subject to the
Commission’s Rules and bylaws as they exist on the date on which the Compact
becomes law in that State. Any Rule that has been previously adopted by the
Commission shall have the full force and effect of law on the day the Compact
becomes law in that State.
B. Any Participating State may withdraw from this Compact by enacting
a statute repealing that State’s enactment of the Compact.
1. A Participating State’s withdrawal shall not take effect
until one hundred eighty (180) days after enactment of the repealing statute.
03-12-2025 11:42:54 JMB127

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 SB111
2. Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the
withdrawing State’s State Licensing Authority or Authorities to comply with
the investigative and Adverse Action reporting requirements of this Compact
prior to the effective date of withdrawal.
3. Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from this
Compact, the State shall immediately provide notice of such withdrawal to all
Licensees within that State. Notwithstanding any subsequent statutory
enactment to the contrary, such withdrawing State shall continue to recognize
all Compact Privileges to practice within that State granted pursuant to this
Compact for a minimum of one hundred eighty (180) days after the date of such
notice of withdrawal.
C. Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to invalidate
or prevent any licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a
Participating State and a non-Participating State that does not conflict with
the provisions of this Compact.
D. This Compact may be amended by the Participating States. No
amendment to this Compact shall become effective and binding upon any
Participating State until it is enacted into the laws of all Participating
States.

SECTION 12. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY
A. This Compact and the Commission’s rulemaking authority shall be
liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes, and the implementation
and administration of the Compact. Provisions of the Compact expressly
authorizing or requiring the promulgation of Rules shall not be construed to
limit the Commission’s rulemaking authority solely for those purposes.
B. The provisions of this Compact shall be severable and if any
phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this Compact is held by a court of
competent jurisdiction to be contrary to the constitution of any
Participating State, a State seeking participation in the Compact, or of the
United States, or the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person
or circumstance is held to be unconstitutional by a court of competent
jurisdiction, the validity of the remainder of this Compact and the
applicability thereof to any other government, agency, person or circumstance
shall not be affected thereby.
C. Notwithstanding subsection B of this section, the Commission may
03-12-2025 11:42:54 JMB127

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 SB111
deny a State’s participation in the Compact or, in accordance with the
requirements of Section 10.B, terminate a Participating State’s participation
in the Compact, if it determines that a constitutional requirement of a
Participating State is a material departure from the Compact. Otherwise, if
this Compact shall be held to be contrary to the constitution of any
Participating State, the Compact shall remain in full force and effect as to
the remaining Participating States and in full force and effect as to the
Participating State affected as to all severable matters.

SECTION 13. CONSISTENT EFFECT AND CONFLICT WITH OTHER STATE LAWS
A. Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of any
other law of a Participating State that is not inconsistent with the Compact.
B. Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal requirements in a
Participating State in conflict with the Compact are superseded to the extent
of the conflict.
C. All permissible agreements between the Commission and the
Participating States are binding in accordance with their terms.

17-82-902. Administration of compact — Rules.
(a) The Arkansas State Board of Dental Examiners is the Dentist and
Dental Hygienist Compact administrator for this state.
(b)(1) The board shall promulgate rules necessary to implement this
subchapter.
(2) Rules promulgated by the board under subdivision (b)(1) of
this section shall be consistent with the Dentist and Dental Hygienist
Compact necessary to implement this subchapter.
(c) The board is not required to adopt the rules of the Dentist and
Dental Hygienist Compact Commission for those rules to be effective in this
state.
(d) For the purposes of the member state's ability to reject a rule
under Section 9(D) of the Dentist and Dental Hygienist Compact, Arkansas
delegates its authority in this provision to the General Assembly or the
Legislative Council.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Initial rules.
(a) The Arkansas State Board of Dental Examiners shall promulgate
03-12-2025 11:42:54 JMB127

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 SB111
rules necessary to implement this act.
(b) When adopting the initial rules to implement this act, the final
rules shall be filed with the Secretary of State for adoption under § 25-15-
204(f):
(1) On or before January 1, 2026; or
(2) If approval under § 10-3-309 has not occurred by January 1,
2026, as soon as practicable after approval under § 10-3-309.
(c) The board shall file the proposed rule with the Legislative
Council under § 10-3-309(c) sufficiently in advance of January 1, 2026, so
that the Legislative Council may consider the rule for approval before
January 1, 2026.

/s/K. Hammer























03-12-2025 11:42:54 JMB127